Alabama, session 2026rs, SB104.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
term "board member" means any member of any department,
council, board, commission, division, bureau, or other entity
subject to the Alabama Sunset Law of 1981, Chapter 20 of Title
41, Code of Alabama 1975. The term does not include any
cabinet member, statewide elected official, or any member of a
county or municipal governing body.
(b) All board members serving on October 1, 2026, shall
complete the board governance course provided for in
subsection (c) on or before March 1, 2027. Any board member
who begins a term of office after October 1, 2026, shall
complete the board governance course within 150 days after
beginning each term of office.
(c) The Department of Examiners of Public Accounts
shall provide a board governance course of not less than five
hours to all board members. The course's curriculum shall be
determined by the Chief Examiner of Public Accounts in
consultation with the Attorney General and shall include, but
not be limited to, all of the following topics as they relate
to board membership:
(1) The Alabama Open Meetings Act.
Page 1

(1) The Alabama Open Meetings Act.
SB104 Enrolled
(2) The role of the Contract Review Permanent
Legislative Oversight Committee.
(3) Travel, compensation, and per diem.
(4) Reoccurring significant issues determined by the
Department of Examiners of Public Accounts during audits and
reviews conducted pursuant to Section 41-20-9, Code of Alabama
1975.
(5) General operating procedures and best practices to
ensure the effective discharge of the duties of board members
in keeping with the highest standards of stewardship and
principles of public service.
(d) The board governance course shall be available
online and may be conducted online or in person. Evidence of
each board member's completion of the course shall be recorded
and maintained by the Department of Examiners of Public
Accounts.
(e) At the conclusion of the board governance course,
each participating board member shall sign a form developed
and provided by the Department of Examiners of Public Accounts
affirming all of the following principles:
(1) That each decision, action, and vote taken or made
as a board member shall be based solely on the needs and
interests served by the entity and the general welfare of the
public.
(2) That no decision, action, or vote shall be taken or
made to serve or promote the personal, political, or pecuniary
interests of a board member.
(3) That the views of all board members of the entity
Page 2

(3) That the views of all board members of the entity
SB104 Enrolled
shall be considered before making a decision or taking an
action on any measure or proposal before the entity.
(4) That the board member shall not make, individually
or jointly, any attempt to direct or corrupt the operations of
the entity in a manner that is inconsistent with the discharge
of the statutory functions and responsibilities of the entity.
(5) That the board member shall attend all meetings of
the entity unless good cause is shown.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3

1, 2026.
SB104 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB104
Senate 22-Jan-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 19-Feb-26




By: Senator Kelley
Page 4